Illinois, session 104th, HB1229.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Medical Patient Rights Act is amended by 5adding Section 3.5 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 50/3.5 new)7    Sec. 3.5. Up-front payment requirements for insureds; 8prohibited. A patient who is covered under a policy of 9accident and health insurance, dental plan, or vision care 10plan is entitled to receive medical, dental, or eye care 11services without being required to pay an amount in excess of 12the estimated cost share, copayment, or deductible before 13those services are provided if such services are typically 14covered under the policy of accident and health insurance, 15dental plan, or vision care plan.